Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 54. Fair Food Delivery Act.

§ 59.1-586.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Food delivery platform” means a person that operates a mobile application or other online service to act as an intermediary between consumers and multiple restaurants to submit food orders on behalf of a consumer to a participating restaurant and to
arrange for the delivery of the order from the restaurant to the consumer.

“Restaurant” has the same meaning as provided in §

35.1-1

and excludes establishments listed in §

35.1-25

.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 485.

The number of this chapter and section
were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been Chapter 52 (§ 59.1-571 et seq.).

Effective date.

This chapter is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 59.1-587.
Food delivery platform; agreements required.

No food delivery platform shall submit an order on behalf of a consumer to a restaurant or arrange for the delivery of an order from a restaurant without first obtaining an agreement with the restaurant expressly authorizing the food delivery platform
to submit orders to and deliver food prepared by the restaurant.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 485.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been 59.1-572.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 59.1-588.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any violation of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice under the provisions of § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of Chapter 17 (§ 59.1-196 et seq.).

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 485.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been 59.1-573.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.